Louisiana, session 2026, HB1125.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 42:808(B) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 42:808(A)(12)
and 851(W) and (X) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§808. Eligibility in group programs
A. For the purposes of participating in life, health, or other programs
sponsored by the Office of Group Benefits, an employee is defined as:
* * *
(12) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an employee who
is employed full-time in a political subdivision's fire department, if the political
subdivision elects participation for these employees. No law, rule, or policy shall
prohibit, restrict, or impede participation pursuant to the provisions of this
Paragraph. For purposes of this Paragraph, the term "fire department" includes any
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2201 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1125
department, district, unit, or organization within local government whose primary
purpose is preventing and extinguishing fires.
B. No individual may participate in a program sponsored by the Office of
Group Benefits unless the school board, state agency, or political subdivision
through which the individual is actively employed or retired from participates in the
program as a group. However; an individual may participate in a program sponsored
by the Office of Group Benefits pursuant to Paragraph (A)(12) of this Section as part
of a class if every employee participating pursuant to Paragraph (A)(12) of this
Section for that employer and every retiree of that employer who participated
pursuant to Paragraph (A)(12) of this Section is made part of the class.
* * *
§851. Authority for employee benefit programs; payroll deduction for payment of
premiums
* * *
W. An employee who participates pursuant to R.S. 42:808(A)(12) shall
receive credit for participation in Office of Group Benefits plans for prior
participation in a health insurance plan sponsored by his employer for the period of
his full-time employment with that employer in the fire department prior to the
employer electing participation pursuant to R.S. 42:808(A)(12). Credit shall be
awarded pursuant to the provisions of this Subsection only for the continuous period
of full-time employment with the participating employer in the fire department as of
the date the employer elects participation pursuant to R.S. 42:808(A)(12). For
purposes of this Subsection, the term "fire department" includes any department,
district, unit, or organization within local government whose primary purpose is
preventing and extinguishing fires.
X.(1) In addition to any other methods provided by law or rule, an employee
or retiree participating in a group benefits plan pursuant to the provisions of this
Chapter shall be permitted to remit required premium contributions through any of
the following methods:
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2201 REENGROSSED
HB NO. 1125
(a) Direct payment by the employee or retiree to the Office of Group
Benefits.
(b) Deduction from a retirement benefit administered by a state or statewide
retirement system, provided such deduction is authorized by the retiree and is
permitted by the applicable retirement system.
(2) No rule, policy, or administrative action of an employer shall prohibit or
unreasonably restrict the use of any payment method authorized in this Chapter or
by rule.
Section 2. The Office of Group Benefits shall promulgate rules pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act necessary for the implementation and administration of this
Act.
Section 3. Eligibility for participation pursuant to the provisions of this Act shall be
limited to employees who have not separated from service as of the date the employer elects
participation.
Section 4. The provisions of this Act shall become effective January 1, 2027.